Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.150

Decree of dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership, legal separation, or declaration of invalidity—Finality—Appeal—Conversion of decree of legal separation to decree of dissolution—Name of party.

(1) A decree of dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership, legal separation, or declaration of invalidity is final when entered, subject to the right of appeal. An appeal which does not challenge the finding that the marriage or domestic partnership is irretrievably broken or was invalid, does not delay the finality of the dissolution or declaration of invalidity and either party may remarry or enter into a domestic partnership pending such an appeal.

(2)(a) No earlier than six months after entry of a decree of legal separation, on motion of either party, the court shall convert the decree of legal separation to a decree of dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership. The clerk of court shall complete the certificate on the form provided by the department of health. On or before the tenth day of each month, the clerk of the court shall forward to the state registrar of vital statistics the certificate of each decree of divorce, dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership, annulment, or separate maintenance granted during the preceding month.

(b) Once a month, the state registrar of vital statistics shall prepare a list of persons for whom a certificate of dissolution of domestic partnership was transmitted to the registrar and was not included in a previous list, and shall supply the list to the secretary of state.

(3) Upon request of a party whose marriage or domestic partnership is dissolved or declared invalid, the court shall order a former name restored or the court may, in its discretion, order a change to another name.

[ 2019 c 148 s 33; 2008 c 6 s 1016. Prior: 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 205; 1989 c 375 s 30; 1973 1st ex.s. c 157 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Rule-making authority—2019 c 148: See RCW 70.58A.901 and 70.58A.902.

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Effect of entry of a decree of dissolution of marriage or a declaration of invalidity or certification of termination of a state registered domestic partnership on nonprobate assets: RCW 11.07.010.